Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-4] Management contract; terms. (a)
A management contract shall include, at a minimum, terms requiring the
financial organization to:

(1) Take any action required to keep the program in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter and take any action not
contrary to the management contract to qualify as a qualified ABLE program as
defined in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(2) Keep accurate records of each account, keep each
account segregated from other accounts and provide the director with the
information necessary to prepare the statements required by section 256B-5;

(3) Compile and total information contained in
statements required to be prepared under section 256B-5 and provide the
compilations to the director;

(4) If there is more than one program manager,
provide the director with the information necessary to determine compliance
with section 256B-5;

(5) Provide the director with access to the books and
records of the program manager to the extent needed to determine compliance
with the contract, this chapter, and section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended;

(6) Hold all accounts for the benefit of the account
owner or owners;

(7) Be audited at least annually by a firm of
certified public accountants selected by the program manager and provide the
results of the audit to the director;

(8) Provide the director with copies of all
regulatory filings and reports made by the financial organization during the
term of the management contract or while the financial organization is holding
any accounts, other than confidential filings or reports that will not become
part of the program. The program manager shall make available for review by
the director the results of any periodic examination of the program manager by
any state or federal banking, insurance, or securities commission, except to
the extent that the report or reports may not be disclosed under law; and

(9) Ensure that any description of the program,
whether in writing or through the use of any media, is consistent with a
marketing plan developed pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The director of finance may:

(1) Enter into contracts as the director deems
necessary and proper for the implementation of the program;

(2) Require that an audit be conducted of the
operations and financial position of the program manager at any time if the
director has any reason to be concerned about the financial position, the
recordkeeping practices, or the status of accounts of the program manager; and

(3) Terminate or not renew a management agreement.
If the director terminates or does not renew a management agreement, the
director shall take custody of accounts held by the program manager and shall
seek to promptly transfer the accounts to another financial organization that
is selected as a program manager and into investment instruments as similar to
the original instruments as possible.

(c) The department of budget and finance,
department of human services, department of health, and executive office on
aging are authorized to exchange data regarding eligible individuals to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next